Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2802
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Pharmacy Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2803 to 38-2848 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 898;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 48;

Laws 2009, LB604, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB179, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 30;

Laws 2017, LB166, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 68;

Laws 2019, LB74, § 2.